Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.147

Diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism—Campus climate assessment.

(1)(a) The institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall each conduct a campus climate assessment to understand the current state of diversity, equity, and inclusion in the learning, working, and living environment on campus for students, faculty, and staff. The assessment shall occur, at minimum, every five years. Institutions of higher education shall use the results of the campus climate assessment to inform the professional development, established in RCW 28B.10.145, and program, established in RCW 28B.10.149. Institutions may use an existing campus climate assessment to meet this requirement.

(b) The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop a model campus climate assessment for the community and technical colleges that the colleges may use or modify to meet the requirements of this section.

(2) The design of an existing or new campus climate assessment must involve, at minimum, students, college and university diversity officers, faculty, and staff. The campus climate assessment must include, at minimum, an evaluation of student and employee attitudes and awareness of campus diversity, equity, and inclusion issues. The campus climate assessment may also include questions evaluating the prevalence of discrimination, sexual assault, harassment, and retaliation on and off campus, in addition to student, faculty, and staff knowledge of campus policies and procedures addressing discrimination, sexual assault, harassment, and retaliation. College and university diversity officers and students must be consulted in the development of recommendations.

(3) Institutions of higher education must, at minimum, conduct annual listening and feedback sessions for diversity, equity, and inclusion for the entire campus community during periods between campus climate assessments. Institutions of higher education must, to the maximum extent practicable, compensate students for their participation in the annual listening and feedback sessions.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2022, the institutions of higher education shall report findings or progress in completing their campus climate assessment and, when applicable, information on their listening and feedback sessions annually to either the state board for community and technical colleges or an organization representing the presidents of the public four-year institutions of higher education. The institutions of higher education must also publish annually on the institution's public website the results of either the campus climate assessment or listening and feedback sessions.

(5) The state board for community and technical colleges may require colleges to repeat their campus climate assessment. An organization representing the presidents of the public four-year institutions of higher education may also request state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College to repeat their campus climate assessment.

[ 2021 c 275 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 275: See notes following RCW 28B.10.145.